Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2017, out of  the General Fund, the following amounts for the
following purposes:
(1) General program and
services provided to
care facility residents ............... $ 4,807,617
(2) Public guardian and
conservator program ................ $ 1,552,515
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $896,835
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,  and in-
cluding federal Older Americans  Act funds received from the Department of Human Ser-
vices, but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described  in this section, collected
or received by the Long Term Care Ombudsman.
SECTION 3.
(1) In  addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2017, out of the General
Fund, the amount  of $200,000, to be allocated to the Long Term Care Ombudsman for costs
associated with the public guardian and conservator program.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2018, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5021 (HB 5021-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5021 (HB 5021-A) Page 2